Alaska, session 34, SB57.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 05 (SECTION 1 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON PAGE 2) 01 * Section 1. The following appropriations are for capital projects and grants from the general 02 fund or other funds as set out in sec. 2 of this Act by funding source to the agencies named for 03 the purposes expressed. They lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise noted. 04 Appropriation General Other 05 Allocations Items Funds Funds 06 * * * * * * * * * * 07 * * * * * Department of Administration * * * * * 08 * * * * * * * * * * 09 Statewide Time and Attendance 4,000,000 4,000,000 10 Management System (HD 1-40) 11 * * * * * * * * * * 12 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 Alaska Energy Authority - Bulk Fuel 4,000,000 2,000,000 2,000,000 15 Upgrades (HD 1-40) 16 Alaska Energy Authority - Cruise Ship 4,400,000 4,400,000 17 Terminal Port Electrification (HD 1- 18 40) 19 Alaska Energy Authority - Dixon 6,000,000 6,000,000 20 Diversion - Bradley Lake Hydro Power 21 (HD 1-40) 22 Alaska Energy Authority - Green House 42,450,000 42,450,000 23 Gas Reduction Fund - Solar for All 24 Competition (HD 1-40) 25 Alaska Energy Authority - Grid 1,500,000 1,500,000 26 Resilience and Innovation Partnership 27 Grant Match (HD 1-40) 28 Alaska Energy Authority - Round 17 6,315,507 6,315,507 29 Renewable Energy Project Grants (AS 30 42.45.045) (HD 1-40) 31 Alaska Energy Authority - Rural Power 5,000,000 2,500,000 2,500,000 01 Systems Upgrades (HD 1-40) 02 Alaska Energy Authority - Statewide 16,691,684 1,816,579 14,875,105 03 Grid Resilience and Reliability - IIJA 04 Formula (HD 1-40) 05 Community Block Grants (HD 1-40) 6,315,000 65,000 6,250,000 06 Purchase Non-voting, Preferred Shares 3,693,500 3,693,500 07 Issued by the Alaska Commercial 08 Fishing and Agriculture Bank (CFAB) 09 (HD 1-40) 10 Grants to Named Recipients (AS 11 37.05.316) 12 Alaska Travel Industry Association - 5,000,000 5,000,000 13 Tourism Marketing Activities in 14 National and International Markets (HD 15 1-40) 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 * * * * * Department of Education and Early Development * * * * * 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 Mt. Edgecumbe High School- Replacement 2,730,000 2,730,000 20 of Dorm Windows (HD 2) 21 Major Maintenance Grant Fund (AS 22 14.11.007) 23 Major Maintenance Grant Fund (HD 1-40) 38,110,038 38,110,038 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 * * * * * Department of Environmental Conservation * * * * * 26 * * * * * * * * * * 27 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 2,149,900 2,149,900 28 Subsidy (HD 1-40) 29 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 6,669,400 6,669,400 30 Subsidy - IIJA, Division J, Title VI 31 (HD 1-40) 01 Clean Water Capitalization Grant 1,273,000 1,273,000 02 Subsidy Emerging Contaminants - IIJA, 03 Division J, Title VI (HD 1-40) 04 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 2,512,300 2,512,300 05 Subsidy (HD 1-40) 06 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 11,262,700 11,262,700 07 Subsidy - IIJA, Division J, Title VI 08 (HD 1-40) 09 Drinking Water Capitalization Grant 7,640,000 7,640,000 10 Subsidy Emerging Contaminants- IIJA, 11 Division J, Title VI (HD 1-40) 12 Environmental Health Laboratory 585,000 585,000 13 Equipment (HD 1-40) 14 Home Heating Oil Tank Oversight (HD 1- 450,000 450,000 15 40) 16 Village Safe Water and Wastewater 437,855,900 21,839,000 416,016,900 17 Infrastructure Projects (HD 1-40) 18 Water Infrastructure Improvements for 628,100 628,100 19 the Nation Act (WIIN) Grants (HD 1-40) 20 Water Infrastructure Improvements for 37,828,000 37,828,000 21 the Nation Act (WIIN) Grants - 22 Emerging Contaminants (HD 1-40) 23 Water Small System Assistance Grants 3,000,000 3,000,000 24 (HD 1-40) 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Department of Fish and Game * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 Alaska Marine Salmon Program (HD 1-40) 800,000 800,000 29 Completion of the South Peninsula King 800,000 800,000 30 Salmon Genetics Study (HD 1-40) 31 Gulf of Alaska Chinook Salmon (HD 1- 2,575,000 2,575,000 01 40) 02 Mission Critical Equipment Replacement 1,000,000 1,000,000 03 (HD 1-40) 04 Pacific Coastal Salmon Recovery Fund 6,800,000 6,800,000 05 (HD 1-40) 06 Pacific Salmon Treaty Chinook Fishery 750,000 750,000 07 Mitigation (HD 1-40) 08 Sport Fish Recreational Boating and 3,000,000 3,000,000 09 Angler Access (HD 1-40) 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 * * * * * Office of the Governor * * * * * 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 Statewide Deferred Maintenance, 20,000,000 20,000,000 14 Renovation, and Repair (HD 1-40) 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 * * * * * Department of Health * * * * * 17 * * * * * * * * * * 18 Emergency Medical Services Match for 500,000 500,000 19 Code Blue Project (HD 1-40) 20 Provider Services Module for Alaska 14,069,766 1,406,976 12,662,790 21 Medicaid Program (HD 1-40) 22 * * * * * * * * * * 23 * * * * * Department of Labor and Workforce Development * * * * * 24 * * * * * * * * * * 25 Certificate of Fitness Licensing 85,000 85,000 26 System (HD 1-40) 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 * * * * * Department of Military and Veterans Affairs * * * * * 29 * * * * * * * * * * 30 Alcantra Modernization (HD 25-30) 1,950,000 700,000 1,250,000 31 Camp Carroll Recruiting and Retention 1,586,000 1,586,000 01 Modernization (HD 18) 02 Camp Denali Barracks Remodel Design 1,000,000 250,000 750,000 03 and Cost Estimate (HD 18) 04 National Guard Counterdrug Support (HD 150,000 150,000 05 1-40) 06 Open Storage Classified Workspace (HD 393,000 93,000 300,000 07 18) 08 State Homeland Security Grant Programs 14,833,000 14,833,000 09 (HD 1-40) 10 Statewide Armory Barracks Conversion 2,200,000 2,200,000 11 Bethel Armory Barracks 550,000 12 Conversion (HD 38) 13 Fairbanks Armory Barracks 500,000 14 Conversion (HD 31-35) 15 Kodiak Armory Barracks 600,000 16 Conversion (HD 5) 17 Nome Armory Barracks 550,000 18 Conversion (HD 39) 19 * * * * * * * * * * 20 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 21 * * * * * * * * * * 22 Abandoned Mine Lands Reclamation 4,330,000 4,330,000 23 Federal Program (HD 1-40) 24 Cooperative Forestry and Fire Programs 12,000,000 12,000,000 25 (HD 1-40) 26 Industry Projects Application Review 500,000 500,000 27 (Dam Safety) (HD 1-40) 28 Land and Water Conservation Fund 3,700,000 800,000 2,900,000 29 (LWCF) Grant Program (HD 1-40) 30 Land Sales New Subdivision Development 500,000 500,000 31 (HD 1-40) 01 National Historic Preservation Fund 3,300,000 1,300,000 2,000,000 02 (HD 1-40) 03 National Recreational Trails Federal 2,750,000 250,000 2,500,000 04 Grant Program (HD 1-40) 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 * * * * * Department of Public Safety * * * * * 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 Aircraft Maintenance and Repairs (HD 550,000 550,000 09 1-40) 10 Alaska Wildlife Trooper Marine Vessel 600,000 600,000 11 Maintenance and Repair (HD 1-40) 12 Fairbanks Post Remodel Evidence 5,850,000 5,850,000 13 Building and Site Work (HD 31-35) 14 Rifle-Rated Armor and Less Lethal 40mm 500,000 500,000 15 Program (HD 1-40) 16 * * * * * * * * * * 17 * * * * * Department of Revenue * * * * * 18 * * * * * * * * * * 19 Dividend Application Information 4,475,000 4,475,000 20 System Replacement - Phase 2 (HD 1-40) 21 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation 22 AHFC Affordable Housing Development 11,000,000 11,000,000 23 Program (HD 1-40) 24 AHFC Competitive Grants for Public 1,350,000 350,000 1,000,000 25 Housing (HD 1-40) 26 AHFC Energy Programs Weatherization 5,000,000 2,000,000 3,000,000 27 (HD 1-40) 28 AHFC Federal and Other Competitive 7,500,000 1,500,000 6,000,000 29 Grants (HD 1-40) 30 AHFC Housing and Urban Development 3,750,000 3,750,000 31 Capital Fund Program (HD 1-40) 01 AHFC Housing and Urban Development 4,750,000 750,000 4,000,000 02 Federal HOME Grant (HD 1-40) 03 AHFC Rental Assistance for Persons 1,500,000 1,500,000 04 Displaced Due to Domestic Violence - 05 Empowering Choice Housing Program 06 (ECHP) (HD 1-40) 07 AHFC Rural Professional Housing (HD 1- 11,550,000 10,550,000 1,000,000 08 40) 09 AHFC Senior Citizens Housing 3,000,000 3,000,000 10 Development Program (HD 1-40) 11 AHFC Supplemental Housing Development 4,000,000 4,000,000 12 Program (HD 1-40) 13 * * * * * * * * * * 14 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 15 * * * * * * * * * * 16 Alaska Marine Highway System Vessel 26,400,000 26,400,000 17 Overhaul, Annual Certification and 18 Shoreside Facilities Rehabilitation 19 (HD 1-40) 20 Alaska West Coast Resiliency Projects 18,180,000 3,636,000 14,544,000 21 - DOT&PF (HD 1-40) 22 Dalton Highway Heavy Maintenance 2,500,000 2,500,000 23 Milepost 76 to 89 (HD 1-40) 24 Klondike - Industrial Use Highway 309,934 309,934 25 Funding (HD 3) 26 Public Building Fund Deferred 6,000,000 6,000,000 27 Maintenance, Renovation, Repair and 28 Equipment (HD 1-40) 29 State Equipment Fleet Replacement (HD 39,000,000 39,000,000 30 1-40) 31 Supervisory Control and Data 100,000 100,000 01 Acquisition System Upgrade (HD 1-40) 02 Ted Stevens Anchorage International 10,000,000 10,000,000 03 10MW Solar Array (HD 9-24) 04 Winter Trail Grooming Grants (HD 1-40) 120,000 120,000 05 Federal Program Match 77,674,645 46,816,078 30,858,567 06 Federal-Aid Aviation State 35,531,165 07 Match (HD 1-40) 08 Federal-Aid Highway Project 1,000,000 09 Match Credits (HD 1-40) 10 Federal-Aid Highway State 31,849,826 11 Match (HD 1-40) 12 Other Federal Program Match 1,611,548 13 (HD 1-40) 14 Surface Transportation 7,682,106 15 Program Local Match (SDPR) 16 (HD 1-40) 17 Statewide Federal Programs 62,837,214 62,837,214 18 Commercial Vehicle 3,000,000 19 Enforcement Program (HD 1- 20 40) 21 Cooperative Reimbursable 15,000,000 22 Projects (HD 1-40) 23 Emergency Relief Funding 15,000,000 24 (HD 1-40) 25 Federal Transit 18,625,323 26 Administration Grants (HD 27 1-40) 28 Highway Safety Grants 11,211,891 29 Program (HD 1-40) 30 Airport Improvement Program 513,550,312 513,550,312 31 Adak Loader (Replace 36088) 950,000 01 (HD 37) 02 AIAS: International Airport 8,835,793 03 System Pre-Construction (HD 04 1-40) 05 AIAS: International 46,424,532 06 Airports Systems Overruns 07 and Other Projects (HD 1- 08 40) 09 Aviation System Plan Update 2,000,000 10 (FFY2026) (HD 1-40) 11 Barrow Pavement Markings 95,000 12 and Crack Seal (HD 40) 13 Bethel Broom/Blower (HD 38) 760,000 14 Bethel Loader (HD 38) 475,000 15 Bethel Taxiway, Apron, 26,942,950 16 Fencing Improvements, and 17 Service Road - Stage 1 (HD 18 38) 19 Cordova Multi Carrier 855,000 20 (Replace 37388 Rotary Plow) 21 (HD 5) 22 Dillingham Tow Broom (HD 570,000 23 37) 24 Dillingham Truck (Tow 380,000 25 Behind Broom) (HD 37) 26 Elim Resurfacing and Dust 389,500 27 Palliative (HD 39) 28 FIA: Advanced Project 228,980 29 Design and Planning (HD 31- 30 35) 31 FIA: Airfield Pavement 322,003 01 Reconstruction and 02 Maintenance (HD 31-35) 03 FIA: Annual Improvements 537,619 04 (HD 31-35) 05 FIA: Environmental Projects 343,470 06 (HD 31-35) 07 FIA: Equipment (HD 31-35) 3,589,716 08 FIA: Facility Improvements, 343,470 09 Renovations, and Upgrades 10 (HD 31-35) 11 FIA: Information Technology 228,980 12 Improvements (HD 31-35) 13 FIA: Master Plan Update (HD 2,500,000 14 31-35) 15 FIA: Rehabilitate South 3,000,000 16 Deicing Basin (HD 31-35) 17 FIA: Security/Perimeter 400,000 18 Fencing Improvements 2024 19 (HD 31-35) 20 FIA: Terminal North Apron 3,500,000 21 Improvements (HD 31-35) 22 Fort Yukon Loader (Replace 456,000 23 36649) (HD 36) 24 Galena Loader and Snow 788,500 25 Blower (HD 36) 26 Golovin Resurfacing and 389,500 27 Dust Palliative (HD 39) 28 Haines Plow Truck (Replace 807,500 29 37389) (HD 3) 30 Haines Repaving, Drainage, 21,897,500 31 and Lighting (HD 3) 01 Homer Airport Master Plan 712,500 02 Update (HD 6) 03 Hoonah Towed Runway Broom 427,500 04 (Replace 10843) (HD 2) 05 Igiugig Resurfacing and 1,330,000 06 Dust Palliative (HD 37) 07 Kake Pavement Markings and 66,500 08 Crack Seal (HD 2) 09 Karluk Grader (Replace 437,000 10 36521) (HD 5) 11 Karluk Surface Maintenance 1,235,000 12 and Dust Palliative (HD 5) 13 Ketchikan Seaplane Ramp 2,375,000 14 Relocation and Floats 15 Removal (HD 1) 16 Ketchikan Terminal Area 6,539,744 17 Expansion - Stage 4 (HD 1) 18 King Cove Loader (Replace 475,000 19 34023) (HD 37) 20 Klawock 8yd 4x6 Plow 437,000 21 (Replace 36193) (HD 2) 22 Kodiak Airport Drainage and 25,939,322 23 Ramp Repave - Stage 4 (HD 24 5) 25 Kokhanok Resurfacing and 16,625,000 26 Fencing (HD 37) 27 Kwigillingok Airport 23,000,000 28 Improvements - Stage 2 (HD 29 38) 30 McGrath Pavement Markings 209,000 31 and Crack Seal (HD 36) 01 Minto Grader (Replace 465,500 02 31161) (HD 36) 03 Mountain Village Snow 5,795,000 04 Removal Equipment Building 05 Replacement (HD 39) 06 Murphy's Pullout Seaplane 7,030,000 07 Base Expansion (HD 1) 08 Napaskiak Loader (HD 38) 475,000 09 Noatak Airport Relocation - 19,000,000 10 Stage 1 (HD 40) 11 Nome Pavement Markings and 95,000 12 Crack Seal (HD 39) 13 Nome Sand Truck (Replace 437,000 14 35869) (HD 39) 15 Northway Grader (HD 36) 465,500 16 Nunam Iqua Airport 27,568,050 17 Improvements (HD 39) 18 Ouzinkie Grader (HD 5) 437,000 19 Pedro Bay Resurfacing and 1,045,000 20 Dust Palliative (HD 37) 21 Platinum Grader (HD 37) 475,000 22 Port Heiden Minor Gravel 1,140,000 23 Resurfacing and Dust 24 Palliative (HD 37) 25 Red Devil Dust Palliative 570,000 26 (HD 37) 27 Replace Akiachak Grader (HD 475,000 28 38) 29 Savoonga Resurfacing and 389,500 30 Dust Palliative (HD 39) 31 Seward Airport Improvements 10,459,816 01 (HD 5) 02 Seward Snow Removal and 5,414,506 03 Sand Storage Building (HD 04 5) 05 Shishmaref Snow Blower (HD 332,500 06 39) 07 Sitka Towed Broom (Replace 427,500 08 #35408) (HD 2) 09 St. George Loader (Replace 456,000 10 35609) (HD 37) 11 St. George Windcone and 1,330,000 12 Beacon (HD 37) 13 St. Paul Loader (Replace 456,000 14 35031) (HD 37) 15 Statewide Airport Lighting 25,935,000 16 Program - Stage 2 (HD 1-40) 17 Statewide Rural Airport 41,250,000 18 System Overruns and Other 19 Projects (HD 1-40) 20 Statewide Rural Airport 22,017,910 21 System Preconstruction (HD 22 1-40) 23 Statewide Various Rural 799,913 24 Airports Minor Surface 25 Improvements and 26 Obstruction Removal (HD 1- 27 40) 28 Statewide Various Rural 3,115,113 29 Airports Snow Removal, ADA, 30 and Safety Equipment 31 Acquisition (HD 1-40) 01 Stony River ALP Update (HD 332,500 02 37) 03 Talkeetna Airport Lighting 4,370,380 04 Improvements (HD 30) 05 Tanana Loader (Replace 788,500 06 38372) (HD 36) 07 TSAIA: Advanced Project 1,717,350 08 Design and Planning (HD 9- 09 24) 10 TSAIA: Airfield Pavement 49,304,180 11 Reconstruction & 12 Maintenance (HD 9-24) 13 TSAIA: Annual Improvements 2,825,877 14 (HD 9-24) 15 TSAIA: Dispatch Room 5,000,000 16 Relocation (HD 9-24) 17 TSAIA: Environmental 228,980 18 Projects (HD 9-24) 19 TSAIA: Equipment (HD 9-24) 4,855,663 20 TSAIA: Facility 3,060,797 21 Improvements, Renovations, 22 and Upgrades (HD 9-24) 23 TSAIA: GIS and Utility 2,000,000 24 Mapping (HD 9-24) 25 TSAIA: Improve Airport 6,100,000 26 Drainage Outfall (HD 9-24) 27 TSAIA: Information 2,289,800 28 Technology Improvements (HD 29 9-24) 30 TSAIA: LHD Aprons A, B, E 1,500,000 31 and Taxiway E Surface Seal 01 (HD 9-24) 02 TSAIA: Passenger Boarding 20,570,898 03 Bridges (HD 9-24) 04 TSAIA: Sand and Chemical 3,500,000 05 Storage Facility Renewal 06 (HD 9-24) 07 TSAIA: Solar Panel 700,000 08 Installation (HD 9-24) 09 TSAIA: Taxiway Z West 17,000,000 10 Extension Phase 1 (HD 9-24) 11 Unalakleet Loader (Replace 456,000 12 33228) (HD 39) 13 Unalaska Loader (Replace 494,000 14 37682) (HD 37) 15 Wales Resurfacing and Dust 389,500 16 Palliative (HD 39) 17 White Mountain Resurfacing 389,500 18 and Dust Palliative (HD 39) 19 Surface Transportation Program 1,066,183,335 1,066,183,335 20 5th Avenue: Concrete Street 3,480,300 21 to Karluk Street Pedestrian 22 Improvements [HSIP '21] (HD 23 18) 24 A Street and C Street 900,000 25 Corridor Plan (HD 13) 26 AASHTO Technical Programs 250,000 27 Support (HD 1-40) 28 Abbott Road Pavement 6,004,020 29 Preservation New Seward 30 Highway to Lake Otis Pkwy 31 (HD 9-24) 01 Academy Drive/Vanguard 4,000,000 02 Drive Area Improvements (HD 03 9-24) 04 Active Transportation 45,485 05 Pavement Replacement 06 Projects [AMATS] (HD 9-24) 07 ADA Improvements in Craig 2,560,806 08 (HD 2) 09 Air Quality Mobile Source 186,105 10 Modeling (HD 1-40) 11 Air Quality Planning 72,776 12 Project Fairbanks (HD 31- 13 35) 14 Air Quality Public and 272,910 15 Business Awareness 16 Education Campaign 2023- 17 2026 AMATS (HD 9-24) 18 Air Quality Public 181,940 19 Education (HD 31-35) 20 Akakeek, Ptarmigan, and 6,012,208 21 DeLapp Reconstruction [CTP 22 Award 2019] (HD 38) 23 Alaska Highway Milepost 22,429,451 24 1380 Johnson River Bridge 25 Replacement [Stage 1] (HD 26 36) 27 Alaska Highway Milepost 700,500 28 1393 Gerstle River Bridge 29 Replacement [Parent and 30 Final Construction] (HD 36) 31 Alaska Highway Mileposts 5,034,260 01 1095-1130 Rehabilitation 02 [Parent Stage 2] (HD 1- 03 40) 04 Aleknagik Lake Road 15,055,535 05 Milepost 5-20 Pavement 06 Preservation (HD 37) 07 AMATS Motorized Pavement 7,800,000 08 Replacement Projects (HD 9- 09 24) 10 AMATS Transportation 3,000,000 11 Improvement Program Capital 12 Vehicles Project (HD 9-24) 13 AMATS: Anchorage 1,418,950 14 Ridesharing / Transit 15 Marketing 2023-2026 (HD 9- 16 24) 17 Anchorage 32nd Avenue 2,000,000 18 Upgrade (HD 14) 19 Anchorage Flashing Yellow 13,463,560 20 Arrow and Signal Head 21 Display Improvements [HSIP 22 '22] (HD 9-24) 23 Anchorage Streets L and I 4,548,500 24 Pavement Preservation (HD 25 9-24) 26 Angoon Ferry Terminal 1,500,000 27 Rehabilitation (HD 2) 28 Anton Anderson Memorial 6,864,000 29 (Whittier) Tunnel 30 Maintenance and Operations 31 (HD 9) 01 Arterial Roadway Dust 100,000 02 Control 2023-2026 (HD 9-24) 03 Avalanche Mitigation 3,183,950 04 Program (HD 1-40) 05 Back Loop Road Resurface 4,184,620 06 (HD 3-4) 07 Big Lake Road 463,947 08 Rehabilitation [SOGR 2022]: 09 Milepost 3.6-9.1 (HD 30) 10 Bogard Road at Engstrom 13,750,200 11 Road and Green Forest Drive 12 Intersection Improvements 13 [HSIP '18] 14 Bogard Road Safety and 2,201,474 15 Capacity Improvements [CTP 16 Award 2023] (HD 25-30) 17 Bridge Access Road Pavement 1,869,434 18 Preservation (HD 7) 19 Bridge and Tunnel 6,276,930 20 Inventory, Inspection, 21 Monitoring, Preservation, 22 and Rehabilitation Program 23 (HD 1-40) 24 Bridge Condition Anomaly 73,159 25 Detection Using Remote 26 Sensing (HD 1-40) 27 Bridge Management System 247,962 28 (HD 1-40) 29 Bridge Scour Monitoring and 2,181,920 30 Retrofit Program FY2024- 31 2025 (HD 1-40) 01 Cascade Point Ferry 4,000,000 02 Terminal Lease Payments (HD 03 3-4) 04 Center Creek Road 15,270,725 05 Rehabilitation (HD 39) 06 Central Region ADA 2,540,970 07 Compliance Project (HD 1- 08 40) 09 Central Region Surface 2,729,100 10 Treatment (HD 1-40) 11 Chena Lake Recreation Area 2,840,083 12 Bicycle and Pedestrian 13 Access (HD 33) 14 Chenega AMHS Ferry Terminal 328,000 15 Reconstruction (HD 5) 16 Chief Eddie Hoffman Highway 2,729,100 17 Reconstruction (HD 38) 18 Chiniak Highway Milepost 20,104,370 19 15-31 Rehabilitation Parent 20 Design/ROW and Stage 1 21 Construction (HD 5) 22 Chugach Way Rehabilitation 1,000,000 23 [Spenard Road to Arctic 24 Boulevard] (HD 14) 25 City of Fairbanks 5,860,000 26 Systematic Signal Upgrades 27 [HSIP '21] [Parent] (HD 31- 28 35) 29 Civil Rights Program (HD 1- 288,804 30 40) 31 Cold Bay AMHS Ferry 8,000 01 Terminal Reconstruction (HD 02 37) 03 Committed Measures for the 2,242,229 04 Fairbanks State 05 Implementation Plan (HD 31- 06 35) 07 Community-Driven Carbon 91,000 08 Reduction Projects [FAST] 09 (HD 31-35) 10 Complete Streets Rural 45,485 11 Pilot Project (HD 2) 12 Cordova AMHS Ferry Terminal 168,000 13 Rehabilitation (HD 5) 14 Craig to Klawock Bike and 139,184 15 Pedestrian Path [Parent and 16 Final Construction] [TAP 17 Award 2023] (HD 2) 18 Cultural Resource 419,819 19 Management (HD 1-40) 20 Culvert Repair and 909,700 21 Replacement (HD 1-40) 22 Dalton Highway Milepost 190 181,940 23 Hammond River Bridge 24 Replacement [WFLHD] (HD 36) 25 Data Modernization and 11,034,962 26 Innovation (HD 1-40) 27 Denali Park Pedestrian 272,910 28 Bridges and Trail [WFLHD] 29 (HD 30) 30 DOT&PF Fleet Conversion (HD 8,548,500 31 1-40) 01 Doughchee Avenue 357,500 02 Rehabilitation (HD 31-36) 03 Dowling Road Pavement 272,910 04 Preservation: Seward 05 Highway to Lake Otis 06 Parkway (HD 9-24) 07 East 4th Avenue Signal and 9,733,790 08 Lighting Upgrade (HD 17) 09 Egan Drive and Yandukin 6,845,493 10 Drive Intersection 11 Improvements (HD 4) 12 Electronic Environmental 90,970 13 Compliance System (HD 1-40) 14 Elliott Highway Milepost 227,425 15 12-18 Rehabilitation (HD 16 36) 17 Elliott Highway Milepost 12,834,412 18 43-51 Resurfacing (HD 31- 19 36) 20 Elliott Highway Milepost 373,600 21 63-73 Rehabilitation (HD 22 36) 23 Fairbanks Area Surface 1,127,500 24 Transportation Area Surface 25 Upgrades FFY2026 (HD 31-35) 26 FAST ADA Improvements 454,850 27 [Parent and Final 28 Construction] (HD 31-35) 29 Ferry Refurbishment (HD 1- 3,600,000 30 40) 31 Ferry Terminal Juneau to 8,733,120 01 Lena Point Pavement 02 Preservation (HD 3-4) 03 Ferry Terminal 1,360,000 04 Rehabilitation (HD 1-40) 05 Fireweed Lane 2,864,550 06 Rehabilitation (HD 9-24) 07 Fish Creek Trail Connection 15,750,000 08 (HD 9-24) 09 Fleet Condition Surveys (HD 320,000 10 1-40) 11 Franklin Street and Thane 3,683,950 12 Road Rehabilitation [SOGR 13 2018] (HD 4) 14 Freight Mobility Update 200,000 15 AMATS (HD 9-24) 16 Front Street Resurfacing: 636,790 17 Greg Kruschek Avenue to 18 Bering Street (HD 39) 19 Gambell Street and Ingra 7,573,253 20 Street - Overhead Signal 21 Indication Upgrades [HSIP 22 '19] (HD 14) 23 Gambell Street Utility Pole 6,303,781 24 Removal and Increased 25 Lighting [HSIP '19] (HD 26 14) 27 Geotechnical Asset 91,051 28 Management Program FY2025- 29 2026 (HD 1-40) 30 Glacier Highway Lighting 2,820,000 31 Improvements: Jensine to 01 Fritz Cove [HSIP '24] (HD 02 3-4) 03 Glacier Highway 809,633 04 Resurfacing: Willoughby 05 Ross Way to Channel Vista 06 Drive (HD 3) 07 Glenn Highway and Hiland 15,564,604 08 Road Interchange 09 Preservation and 10 Operational Improvements 11 (HD 9-24) 12 Glenn Highway and Old Glenn 1,455,520 13 Highway Erosion Control (HD 14 25-30) 15 Glenn Highway Arctic Avenue 2,432,238 16 to Palmer-Fishhook Road 17 Safety and Capacity 18 Improvements [SOGR 2018] 19 (HD 25-30) 20 Glenn Highway Incident 14,316,549 21 Management and Traffic 22 Accommodations [Stage 1] 23 (HD 9-24) 24 Glenn Highway Lighting 181,940 25 Improvements (HD 9-24) 26 Glenn Highway Long Lake 3,736,000 27 Realignment (HD 29) 28 Glenn Highway Milepost 1-34 98,029,838 29 Rehabilitation: Airport 30 Heights to Parks Highway 31 [Stages 1 and 1B] (HD 9-24) 01 Glenn Highway Milepost 158- 682,275 02 172 Rehabilitation [SOGR 03 2018] (HD 36) 04 Glenn Highway Milepost 53- 840,600 05 56 Reconstruction and Moose 06 Creek Bridge Replacement 07 (HD 25-30) 08 Glenn Highway Milepost 16,415,537 09 66.5-92 Pavement 10 Preservation [Stage 2: MP 11 75-83.5] (HD 29) 12 Glenn Highway Trail 545,820 13 Connection (HD 9-24) 14 Healy Area and School 409,365 15 Pedestrian Path [TAP Award 16 2023] (HD 30) 17 Healy to Antler Ridge Trail 181,940 18 Separated Path [TAP Award 19 2023] (HD 30) 20 Highway Fuel Tax Evasion 100,000 21 (HD 1-40) 22 Highway Performance 150,000 23 Monitoring System Reporting 24 System FFY2024-2026 (HD 1- 25 40) 26 Highway Safety Improvement 2,894,952 27 Program Safety Management: 28 Alaska-wide (HD 1-40) 29 Hillside Drive DeArmoun 45,485 30 Road to O'Malley Road 31 Pavement Preservation (HD 01 11) 02 Hollywood Road and Vine 6,731,780 03 Road Intersection 04 Improvements [HSIP '18] (HD 05 26) 06 Holmes Road Rehabilitation 727,760 07 (HD 31-35) 08 Homer All-Ages and 208,800 09 Abilities Pedestrian 10 Pathway (HAPP) [TAP Award 11 2023] (HD 6) 12 Ice Roads, Seasonal Roads, 3,860,403 13 and Winter Trails Program 14 (HD 1-40) 15 Inner and Outer Springer 272,910 16 Loop Road Separated Pathway 17 [TAP Award 2023] (HD 25-30) 18 Kachemak Bay Drive Milepost 600,000 19 0-3.5 Reconstruction (HD 6) 20 Kake Ferry Terminal 42,000 21 Rehabilitation (HD 2) 22 Kalifornsky Beach Road 2,150,000 23 Drainage Improvements (HD 24 7) 25 Keku Road Resurfacing: Kake 3,281,621 26 to Seal Point [WFLHD] (HD 27 2) 28 Kenai Spur Highway Milepost 14,018,477 29 29-38 Pavement Preservation 30 (HD 7) 31 Ketchikan Shipyard 3,787,081 01 Receiving Slab 02 Rehabilitation (HD 1) 03 Klondike Highway Rockfall 706,770 04 Mitigation (HD 3) 05 Knik River Wayside Gold 1,186,181 06 Star Families Memorial [TAP 07 Award 2023] (HD 26) 08 Mendenhall Loop Paving (HD 3,684,285 09 3-4) 10 Metropolitan Planning 152,519 11 Organization (MPO) 12 Planning: FAST (HD 31-35) 13 Microtransit Service AMATS 50,000 14 (HD 9-24) 15 Minnie Street Improvements 1,432,300 16 (HD 31) 17 Montana Creek Bridge 175,117 18 Replacement [TAP Award 19 2023] (HD 3) 20 Morris Thompson Center and 1,037,058 21 Lavery Transportation 22 Enhancements (HD 31) 23 Muldoon Transit Hub Mixed- 3,561,000 24 Use Development (HD 22) 25 Murphy Dome Road Milepost 180,000 26 0-2 Shoulder Widening [HSIP 27 '23] [VRU] (HD 31-35) 28 Naknek and King Salmon Non- 302,498 29 Motorized Pathway [TAP 30 Award 2023] (HD 37) 31 National Electric Vehicle 11,844,176 01 Infrastructure Program (HD 02 1-40) 03 Non-Motorized Facility 800,000 04 Maintenance Equipment AMATS 05 (HD 9-24) 06 Non-Motorized Facility 658,000 07 Maintenance Equipment for 08 Winter Greenbelt Trails (HD 09 9-24) 10 Non-Motorized Safety 100,000 11 Campaign AMATS FFY2023-2026 12 (HD 9-24) 13 North Tongass Highway 72,776 14 Resurfacing: Airport FT 15 Parking Lot to Ward Ceed 16 Bridge [Parent and Final 17 Construction] (HD 1) 18 Northern Region ADA 1,728,430 19 Improvements - Fairbanks: 20 6th and 7th Avenue (HD 31) 21 Northern Region Seismic 6,367,900 22 Bridge Retrofit FFY2024 (HD 23 1-40) 24 Off-System Alternative Fuel 5,311,668 25 and Electric Vehicle 26 Charging Infrastructure 27 Program (HD 1-40) 28 Old Glenn Highway Inner and 272,910 29 Outer Springer Loop 30 Pavement Preservation (HD 31 25) 01 Old Seward Highway and 14,555,200 02 Huffman Road, Rabbit Creek 03 Road to O'Malley Road to 04 Birch Road (HD 9-24) 05 Old Seward Highway 2,029,433 06 Channelization: Industry 07 Way and 120th Ave [HSIP 08 '23] (HD 9-24) 09 Palmer-Fishhook Separated 251,819 10 Pathway: Trunk Road to 11 Edgerton Parks Road [TAP 12 Award 2023] (HD 25-30) 13 Parks Highway Milepost 183- 454,850 14 192 Reconstruction (HD 30) 15 Parks Highway Milepost 206- 15,937,344 16 209 Reconstruction (HD 30) 17 Parks Highway Milepost 303- 3,082,200 18 306 Rehabilitation (HD 36) 19 Parks Highway Milepost 315- 37,360,000 20 325 Reconstruction [Parent 21 and Final Construction] (HD 22 36) 23 Parks Highway Milepost 52- 1,868,000 24 57 Big Lake to Houston 25 Reconstruction (HD 30) 26 Parks Highway Milepost 57- 840,600 27 72 Rehabilitation: Houston 28 to Willow (HD 30) 29 Parks Highway Milepost 99- 18,026,200 30 163 Improvements and 31 Railroad Creek Bridge 01 Replacement [SOGR 2018] 02 [Stage 3] (HD 30) 03 Parks Highway Nenana River 645,394 04 Bridge at Moody No. 1143 05 Preventative Maintenance 06 (HD 30) 07 Parks Highway Sheep Creek 6,147,000 08 Extension Traffic Signal 09 [HSIP '23] (HD 35) 10 Pease Avenue Railroad 1,180,800 11 Crossing Surface and Signal 12 Upgrades [HSIP '24] (HD 18) 13 Pelican Ferry Terminal 162,000 14 Replacement (HD 2) 15 Pioneer Park Boat Launch/ 3,786,000 16 Parking/Plug-Ins and Peger 17 Road Path (HD 31) 18 Pittman Road Shoulder 24,275,345 19 Widening and Slope 20 Flattening [HSIP '22] (HD 21 27) 22 Public Transit Operational 158,000 23 Assistance / Expansion (HD 24 9-24) 25 Rabbit Creek Road 4,548,500 26 Rehabilitation (HD 9) 27 Rapid Post-Earthquake 172,607 28 Displacement-Based 29 Assessment Methodology for 30 Bridges Phase 2 (HD 1-40) 31 Recreational Trails Program 1,649,440 01 (HD 1-40) 02 Redoubt Avenue and Smith 5,134,803 03 Way Rehabilitation [CTP 04 Award 2019] (HD 7) 05 Research and Technology 2,556,104 06 Transfer Program (HD 1-40) 07 Rezanof Drive ADA 3,047,495 08 Improvements [Stages 1 & 2] 09 (HD 5) 10 Rezanof Drive Resurfacing: 16,583,093 11 West Marine Way to the 12 Airport [SOGR 2022] (HD 5) 13 Richardson Highway Milepost 323,853 14 210 Rockfall Mitigation (HD 15 36) 16 Richardson Highway Milepost 467,000 17 214-218 Reconstruction and 18 Bridge Replacement (HD 36) 19 Richardson Highway Milepost 1,195,520 20 235-257 Rehabilitation 21 [Parent and Final 22 Construction] (HD 36) 23 Richardson Highway Milepost 500,000 24 341-362 Variable Speed 25 Limit [HSIP '24] (HD 31-35) 26 Rural Ports and Barge 1,873,982 27 Landings Program (HD 1-40) 28 Sargent Creek Bridge 513,980 29 Replacement [SOGR Award 30 2022] (HD 5) 31 Second Street 727,760 01 Reconstruction [CTP Award 02 2019] (HD 5) 03 Seismic Bridge Retrofit 627,315 04 Program (HD 1-40) 05 Seldon Road Extension: 18,556,060 06 Windy Bottom/Beverly Lakes 07 Road to Pittman Road [CTP 08 Award] [Stage 2] (HD 27) 09 Seldon Road Reconstruction: 1,230,750 10 Wasilla-Fishhook Road to 11 Lucille Street [CTP Award 12 2023] [Parent] (HD 28) 13 Seniors and Youth Ride Free 916,000 14 (HD 9-24) 15 Seward Highway and Sterling 907,600 16 Highway Intersection 17 Improvements SOGR 2018 18 [Parent and Final 19 Construction] (HD 6) 20 Seward Highway Milepost 90- 17,960,820 21 99 Pavement Preservation 22 (HD 9) 23 Seward Highway Milepost 16,158,200 24 98.5-112 Bird Flats to 25 McHugh Creek [Parent and 26 Final Construction] (HD 9) 27 Seward Highway Milepost 70,050,000 28 98.5-112 Bird Flats to 29 McHugh Creek [Stage 1] (HD 30 9) 31 Seward Highway Rockfall 17,488,800 01 Mitigation Milepost 113.2 02 [HSIP] (HD 9) 03 Seward Highway Spur: Old 7,095,660 04 Seward Highway to Potter 05 Valley Road (HD 9-24) 06 Sheep Creek Road and West 181,940 07 Tanana Drive Roundabout (HD 08 35) 09 Shishmaref Sanitation Road 17,284,300 10 Erosion Control [Stage 2] - 11 East (HD 39) 12 Skagway, Hoonah, and 4,548,500 13 Petersburg Roadway and 14 Culverts Repairs December 15 2020 Storm (HD 1-4) 16 Small Hydrologic 113,714 17 Investigations (HD 1-40) 18 Soil Stabilization Using 123,341 19 Locally Sourced Fly Ash (HD 20 1-40) 21 South Tongass Highway and 8,187,300 22 Water Street Viaduct 23 Improvements Parent Design/ 24 ROW and Stage 1 25 Construction/Utilities (HD 26 1) 27 South Tongass Highway 90,970 28 Hoadley Creek Bridge 29 Replacement (HD 1) 30 South Tongass Highway 16,456,088 31 Saxman to Surf Street 01 Reconstruction (HD 1) 02 Southcoast Regionwide 314,756 03 Lighting Replacement (HD 1- 04 40) 05 Southeast Alaska Port 318,395 06 Electrification (HD 1-4) 07 State-Owned Shipyard 482,550 08 Repairs (HD 1) 09 Statewide Bridge 91,880 10 Navigational Light 11 Improvements (HD 1-40) 12 Statewide Functional Class 170,673 13 Update FY2023-2026 (HD 1- 14 40) 15 Steese Expressway and 909,700 16 Johansen Expressway 17 Interchange [Parent and 18 Final Construction] (HD 31- 19 35) 20 Steese Highway Milepost 128 341,138 21 Crooked Creek Bridge 22 Replacement (HD 31-36) 23 Sterling Highway Milepost 44,490,530 24 157-169 Parent/Final 25 Construction and Stage 3 26 HSIP (HD 6) 27 Sterling Highway Milepost 56,205,000 28 82.5-94 Safety Corridor 29 Improvements [Stage 1] (HD 30 7) 31 Strategic Highway Safety 150,000 01 Plan FY2024-2025 (HD 1-40) 02 Surface Transportation 1,000,000 03 Overruns and Other Projects 04 (HD 1-40) 05 Tatitlek AMHS Ferry 328,000 06 Terminal Rehabilitation (HD 07 5) 08 Tok Cutoff Highway Milepost 840,600 09 76-91 Rehabilitation [SOGR 10 2018] (HD 36) 11 Traffic Control 400,000 12 Signalization 2023-2026 (HD 13 9-24) 14 Traffic Data Management 151,334 15 System FFY2025-2026 (HD 1- 16 40) 17 Transportation Asset 500,335 18 Management Plan (TAMP) (HD 19 1-40) 20 Transportation Plans and 739,574 21 Studies [FAST] (HD 31-35) 22 Transportation Workforce 5,136,817 23 Development and Training 24 (HD 1-40) 25 Trunk Road (Nelson Road) 4,193,717 26 Rehabilitation and Bridge 27 Replacement [CTP Award 28 2019] (HD 25-30) 29 U.S. Geological Survey 688,836 30 Flood Frequency and 31 Analysis (HD 1-40) 01 Vintage Boulevard and 484,417 02 Clinton Drive 03 Reconstruction [CTP Award 04 2023] (HD 3) 05 Ward Creek Bridge 32,226,507 06 Replacement (HD 1) 07 Winter Trail Marking (HD 1- 391,262 08 40) 09 Yakutat Arhnkline River 1,364,550 10 Bridge (No. 1229) Abutment 11 Slope Restoration (HD 2) 12 Yakutat Ferry Terminal 720,000 13 Reconstruction (HD 2) 14 Yukon Kuskokwim Frontier 1,091,640 15 Road Construction (HD 36) 16 Rural Ferry Grants 139,272,620 1,250,000 138,022,620 17 Deploying System-wide Wi-Fi 6,250,000 18 (HD 1-40) 19 Federal Toll Credits for 26,604,524 20 Match (HD 1-40) 21 M/V Tustumena Replacement 106,418,096 22 Vessel (HD 1-40) 23 * * * * * * * * * * 24 * * * * * University of Alaska * * * * * 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 Facilities Deferred Maintenance and 10,000,000 10,000,000 27 Modernization (HD 1-40) 28 UAA Alaska Leaders Archives Consortium 35,750,000 1,250,000 34,500,000 29 Library Renovation (HD 19) 30 UAF Troth Yeddha' Indigenous Studies 53,000,000 53,000,000 31 Center (HD 35) 01 UAS Mariculture Program Expansion (HD 2,000,000 2,000,000 02 2) 03 * * * * * * * * * * 04 * * * * * Judiciary * * * * * 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 Court Security Projects (HD 1-40) 1,000,000 1,000,000 07 Building Repairs (HD 1-40) 1,500,000 1,500,000 08 (SECTION 2 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 2. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Administration 05 1275 AIDEA Reserves 4,000,000 06 *** Total Agency Funding *** 4,000,000 07 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 08 1002 Federal Receipts 68,075,105 09 1003 General Fund Match 7,881,579 10 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 11,000,000 11 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 4,400,000 12 1209 Alaska Capstone Avionics Revolving Loan Fund 3,693,500 13 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 6,315,507 14 *** Total Agency Funding *** 101,365,691 15 Department of Education and Early Development 16 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 10,840,038 17 1193 Major Maintenance Grant Fund 30,000,000 18 *** Total Agency Funding *** 40,840,038 19 Department of Environmental Conservation 20 1002 Federal Receipts 456,973,000 21 1003 General Fund Match 21,839,000 22 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 585,000 23 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention & Response Fund 450,000 24 1075 Alaska Clean Water Fund 10,092,300 25 1100 Alaska Drinking Water Fund 21,415,000 26 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 500,000 27 *** Total Agency Funding *** 511,854,300 28 Department of Fish and Game 29 1002 Federal Receipts 10,300,000 30 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 4,175,000 31 1024 Fish and Game Fund 1,250,000 01 *** Total Agency Funding *** 15,725,000 02 Office of the Governor 03 1197 Alaska Capital Income Fund 20,000,000 04 *** Total Agency Funding *** 20,000,000 05 Department of Health 06 1002 Federal Receipts 12,662,790 07 1003 General Fund Match 1,906,976 08 *** Total Agency Funding *** 14,569,766 09 Department of Labor and Workforce Development 10 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 85,000 11 *** Total Agency Funding *** 85,000 12 Department of Military and Veterans Affairs 13 1002 Federal Receipts 18,839,500 14 1003 General Fund Match 1,043,000 15 1275 AIDEA Reserves 2,229,500 16 *** Total Agency Funding *** 22,112,000 17 Department of Natural Resources 18 1002 Federal Receipts 23,730,000 19 1003 General Fund Match 1,550,000 20 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 800,000 21 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 500,000 22 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 500,000 23 *** Total Agency Funding *** 27,080,000 24 Department of Public Safety 25 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 5,850,000 26 1275 AIDEA Reserves 1,650,000 27 *** Total Agency Funding *** 7,500,000 28 Department of Revenue 29 1002 Federal Receipts 29,250,000 30 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 4,475,000 31 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 500,000 01 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 23,650,000 02 *** Total Agency Funding *** 57,875,000 03 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 04 1002 Federal Receipts 1,728,831,512 05 1003 General Fund Match 49,702,078 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 1,000,000 07 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 1,309,934 08 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 39,000,000 09 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 80,414,991 10 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 26,400,000 11 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 17,682,106 12 1147 Public Building Fund 6,100,000 13 1179 Passenger Facility Charges 6,996,000 14 1195 Snow Machine Registration Receipts 120,000 15 1275 AIDEA Reserves 4,571,439 16 *** Total Agency Funding *** 1,962,128,060 17 University of Alaska 18 1002 Federal Receipts 8,300,000 19 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 13,250,000 20 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 79,200,000 21 *** Total Agency Funding *** 100,750,000 22 Judiciary 23 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 2,500,000 24 *** Total Agency Funding *** 2,500,000 25 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 2,888,384,855 26 (SECTION 3 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 3. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 1 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1003 General Fund Match 83,922,633 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 49,285,038 07 1139 Alaska Housing Finance Corporation Dividend 23,650,000 08 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 156,857,671 09 Designated General 10 1005 General Fund/Program Receipts 2,109,934 11 1052 Oil/Hazardous Release Prevention & Response Fund 450,000 12 1076 Alaska Marine Highway System Fund 26,400,000 13 1153 State Land Disposal Income Fund 500,000 14 1193 Major Maintenance Grant Fund 30,000,000 15 1195 Snow Machine Registration Receipts 120,000 16 1197 Alaska Capital Income Fund 20,000,000 17 1209 Alaska Capstone Avionics Revolving Loan Fund 3,693,500 18 1210 Renewable Energy Grant Fund 6,315,507 19 *** Total Designated General *** 89,588,941 20 Other Non-Duplicated 21 1024 Fish and Game Fund 1,250,000 22 1027 International Airports Revenue Fund 80,414,991 23 1108 Statutory Designated Program Receipts 98,382,106 24 1179 Passenger Facility Charges 6,996,000 25 1205 Berth Fees for the Ocean Ranger Program 4,400,000 26 1275 AIDEA Reserves 12,450,939 27 *** Total Other Non-Duplicated *** 203,894,036 28 Federal Receipts 29 1002 Federal Receipts 2,356,961,907 30 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 2,356,961,907 31 Other Duplicated 01 1026 Highways Equipment Working Capital Fund 39,000,000 02 1050 Permanent Fund Dividend Fund 4,475,000 03 1075 Alaska Clean Water Fund 10,092,300 04 1100 Alaska Drinking Water Fund 21,415,000 05 1147 Public Building Fund 6,100,000 06 *** Total Other Duplicated *** 81,082,300 07 (SECTION 4 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 4. The following appropriations are for supplemental capital projects and grants from 02 the general fund or other funds as set out in section 5 of this Act by funding source to the 03 agencies named for the purposes expressed and lapse under AS 37.25.020, unless otherwise 04 noted. 05 Appropriation General Other 06 Allocations Items Funds Funds 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 * * * * * Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development * * * * * 09 * * * * * * * * * * 10 Administrative Systems Updates (HD 1- 628,700 628,700 11 40) 12 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 25,000,000 25,000,000 13 Commission Orphaned Well Formula 14 Grants (HD 1-40) 15 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 40,000,000 40,000,000 16 Commission Orphaned Well Performance 17 Grants (HD 1-40) 18 Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation 1,875,567 1,875,567 19 Commission Risk Based Data Management 20 System Upgrade Phase 1 (HD 1-40) 21 Blood Bank of Alaska - Blood Donor 500,000 500,000 22 Testing Laboratory (HD 9) 23 Leased Warehouse Repairs and 100,000 100,000 24 Improvements (HD 1-40) 25 * * * * * * * * * * 26 * * * * * Office of the Governor * * * * * 27 * * * * * * * * * * 28 Elections Security Grant Under the 342,272 342,272 29 Help America Vote Act (HD 1-40) 30 * * * * * * * * * * 31 * * * * * Department of Military and Veterans Affairs * * * * * 01 * * * * * * * * * * 02 Flood Mitigation for Acquisition of 2,500,000 2,500,000 03 High Hazard Areas in the Matanuska- 04 Susitna Borough (HD 25-30) 05 * * * * * * * * * * 06 * * * * * Department of Natural Resources * * * * * 07 * * * * * * * * * * 08 National Recreational Trails Federal 600,000 600,000 09 Grant Program (HD 1-40) 10 * * * * * * * * * * 11 * * * * * Department of Transportation and Public Facilities * * * * * 12 * * * * * * * * * * 13 Alaska Marine Highway System Vessel 6,500,000 6,500,000 14 Overhaul, Annual Certification and 15 Shoreside Facilities Rehabilitation 16 (HD 1-40) 17 (SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 5. The following sets out the funding by agency for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Department of Commerce, Community and Economic Development 05 1002 Federal Receipts 65,000,000 06 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 500,000 07 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission Receipts 1,875,567 08 1219 Emerging Energy Technology Fund 728,700 09 *** Total Agency Funding *** 68,104,267 10 Office of the Governor 11 1185 Election Fund (Help America Vote Act) 342,272 12 *** Total Agency Funding *** 342,272 13 Department of Military and Veterans Affairs 14 1002 Federal Receipts 2,500,000 15 *** Total Agency Funding *** 2,500,000 16 Department of Natural Resources 17 1002 Federal Receipts 600,000 18 *** Total Agency Funding *** 600,000 19 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities 20 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 6,500,000 21 *** Total Agency Funding *** 6,500,000 22 * * * * * Total Budget * * * * * 78,046,539 23 (SECTION 6 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 6. The following sets out the statewide funding for the appropriations made in sec. 4 of 02 this Act. 03 Funding Source Amount 04 Unrestricted General 05 1004 Unrestricted General Fund Receipts 7,000,000 06 *** Total Unrestricted General *** 7,000,000 07 Designated General 08 1162 Alaska Oil & Gas Conservation Commission Receipts 1,875,567 09 *** Total Designated General *** 1,875,567 10 Federal Receipts 11 1002 Federal Receipts 68,100,000 12 *** Total Federal Receipts *** 68,100,000 13 Other Duplicated 14 1185 Election Fund (Help America Vote Act) 342,272 15 1219 Emerging Energy Technology Fund 728,700 16 *** Total Other Duplicated *** 1,070,972 17 (SECTION 7 OF THIS ACT BEGINS ON THE NEXT PAGE) 01 * Sec. 7. SUPPLEMENTAL DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND 02 ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT. The unexpended and unobligated balance, estimated to be 03 $234,500, of the appropriation made in sec. 1, ch. 16, SLA 2013, page 4, lines 11 - 13 04 (Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska Energy 05 Authority, energy programs, alternative energy and energy efficiency programs - $2,000,000), 06 is reappropriated to the Alaska Energy Authority for the electrical emergencies program. 07 * Sec. 8. FEDERAL AND OTHER PROGRAM RECEIPTS. (a) Federal receipts, 08 designated program receipts under AS 37.05.146(b)(3), information services fund program 09 receipts under AS 44.21.045(b), Exxon Valdez oil spill trust receipts under 10 AS 37.05.146(b)(4), receipts of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, receipts of the 11 Alaska marine highway system fund under AS 19.65.060(a), receipts of the vaccine 12 assessment fund under AS 18.09.230, receipts of the University of Alaska under 13 AS 37.05.146(b)(2), receipts of the highways equipment working capital fund under 14 AS 44.68.210, and receipts of commercial fisheries test fishing operations under 15 AS 37.05.146(c)(20) that are received during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, and that 16 exceed the amounts appropriated by this Act are appropriated conditioned on compliance with 17 the program review provisions of AS 37.07.080(h). Receipts received under this section 18 during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, do not include the balance of a state fund on 19 June 30, 2025. 20 (b) Notwithstanding (a) of this section, an appropriation item for the fiscal year 21 ending June 30, 2026, may not be increased under AS 37.07.080(h) based on the Alaska 22 Gasline Development Corporation's receipt of additional 23 (1) federal receipts; or 24 (2) statutory designated program receipts. 25 * Sec. 9. INSURANCE CLAIMS. The amounts to be received in settlement of insurance 26 claims for losses and the amounts to be received as recovery for losses are appropriated from 27 the general fund to the 28 (1) state insurance catastrophe reserve account (AS 37.05.289(a)); or 29 (2) appropriate state agency to mitigate the loss. 30 * Sec. 10. NATIONAL PETROLEUM RESERVE - ALASKA IMPACT GRANT 31 PROGRAM. The amount received by the National Petroleum Reserve - Alaska special 01 revenue fund (AS 37.05.530(a)) under 42 U.S.C. 6506a(l) or former 42 U.S.C. 6508 by 02 June 30, 2025, estimated to be $29,500,000, is appropriated from that fund to the Department 03 of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for capital project grants under the 04 National Petroleum Reserve - Alaska impact grant program. 05 * Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, COMMUNITY, AND ECONOMIC 06 DEVELOPMENT. (a) The sum of $600,000 is appropriated from the general fund to the 07 Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development for payments as 08 organization grants under AS 29.05.190 to the Xunaa Borough for the fiscal years ending 09 June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028. 10 (b) Tax credits available from the federal government for certain renewable energy 11 projects funded by the Alaska Energy Authority, estimated to be $0, are appropriated to the 12 Alaska Energy Authority for continued funding of renewable energy projects or matching 13 funds for federal grants. 14 * Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND EARLY DEVELOPMENT. (a) The 15 proceeds from the sale of the Stratton Library building in Sitka are appropriated from the 16 general fund to the Department of Education and Early Development, Alaska state libraries, 17 archives and museums, for renovation and repair of, and other necessary projects related to, 18 the Sheldon Jackson Museum in Sitka and other buildings and facilities. It is the intent of the 19 legislature that the department and the Alaska Court System negotiate in good faith to 20 facilitate the sale and, if the parties agree on the terms of the sale, that the Alaska Court 21 System submit a request for a supplemental appropriation in the amount of the purchase price. 22 (b) If the unexpended and unobligated balance on July 1, 2025, of the major 23 maintenance grant fund (AS 14.11.007) is less than $38,110,038, the amount of the shortfall is 24 appropriated from the general fund to the major maintenance grant fund (AS 14.11.007). 25 * Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF FAMILY AND COMMUNITY SERVICES. The 26 unexpended and unobligated balance, estimated to be $4,000,000, of the appropriation made 27 in sec. 37(c), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023 (Department of Family and Community Services, deferred 28 maintenance at the Fairbanks Youth Facility), is reappropriated to the Department of Family 29 and Community Services for the facility remodel of the McLaughlin Youth Center in 30 Anchorage. 31 * Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME. (a) The proceeds received by the 01 Department of Fish and Game during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, from the sale of 02 state-owned vessels and aircraft purchased without using federal funds, estimated to be 03 $150,000, are appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for renewal, replacement, and 04 maintenance of vessels and aircraft. 05 (b) The proceeds received by the Department of Fish and Game during the fiscal year 06 ending June 30, 2026, from the sale of state-owned equipment purchased by the Department 07 of Fish and Game for federal projects using federal funds, estimated to be $200,000, are 08 appropriated to the Department of Fish and Game for renewal, replacement, and maintenance 09 of equipment to facilitate the same federal projects. 10 * Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF LAW. The sum of $7,000,000 is appropriated to the 11 Department of Law for the replacement of the department's case management systems from 12 the following sources: 13 (1) the unexpended and unobligated balance, estimated to be $3,524,096, of 14 the appropriation made in sec. 8, ch. 1, SSSLA 2021, page 74, lines 4 - 7 (Department of Law, 15 prosecutor recruitment and housing to address sexual assault and sexual abuse of a minor case 16 backlog - $4,000,000); and 17 (2) the amount necessary, after the appropriation made in (1) of this section, 18 estimated to be $3,475,904, from the general fund. 19 * Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS' AFFAIRS. Section 1, ch. 20 18, SLA 2014, page 55, lines 29 - 31, is amended to read: 21 APPROPRIATION GENERAL 22 ITEMS FUND 23 Fairbanks Veterans Cemetery - Planning, Design, 100,000 100,000 24 and Construction [GOLD RUSH HISTORIC 25 DITCH MITIGATION] (HD 1-5) 26 * Sec. 17. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY. The unexpended and unobligated 27 balance, not to exceed $450,000, of the appropriation made in sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2018, page 28 8, line 29 (Department of Public Safety, enhanced "9-1-1" - $3,535,000), is reappropriated to 29 the Department of Public Safety for communication enhancements for the Rabinowitz 30 Courthouse in Fairbanks. 31 * Sec. 18. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. The sum of $500,000 is appropriated from the 01 general fund to the Department of Revenue for necessary updates to the department's tax 02 revenue management system and associated information technology modifications related to 03 corporate tax law changes. 04 * Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION AND PUBLIC FACILITIES. (a) The 05 unexpended and unobligated general fund balances, estimated to be a total of $41,095,007, of 06 the following appropriations are reappropriated to the Department of Transportation and 07 Public Facilities for federal-aid highway state match, including unforeseen or federally 08 ineligible costs in previous and current fiscal year federal-aid highway projects: 09 (1) sec. 7, ch. 43, SLA 2010, page 36, lines 29 - 31 (Department of 10 Transportation and Public Facilities, Fairview Loop Road, pedestrian pathway - $4,500,000), 11 estimated balance of $201,221; 12 (2) sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2012, page 100, lines 15 - 19 (Southeast Alaska Power 13 Agency, hydroelectric storage, generation, transmission, and business analysis - $3,000,000), 14 estimated balance of $34,359; 15 (3) sec. 38(d), ch. 16, SLA 2013 (Kenai Peninsula Borough, maintenance and 16 repairs on the Jacob's Ladder access trail), estimated balance of $1,484; 17 (4) sec. 1, ch. 18, SLA 2014, page 63, line 4, and allocated on page 63, lines 18 12 - 13, as amended by secs. 14(d), 21(g), and 21(h), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of 19 Transportation and Public Facilities, economic development, Knik Arm bridge project 20 development), estimated balance of $766; 21 (5) sec. 21(d), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and Public 22 Facilities, Juneau access project), estimated balance of $16,088,569; 23 (6) sec. 26(i), ch. 19, SLA 2018, as amended by sec. 9(11), ch. 8, SLA 2024 24 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, Juneau access project), estimated balance 25 of $20,986,483; 26 (7) sec. 4, ch. 7, SLA 2020, page 9, lines 20 - 21 (Department of 27 Transportation and Public Facilities, earthquake relief, federally ineligible costs - $3,000,000), 28 estimated balance of $3,000,000; and 29 (8) sec. 14, ch. 11, SLA 2022, page 117, lines 19 - 20 (Department of 30 Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, Alaska Energy Authority, electrical 31 vehicle infrastructure plan - $1,500,000), estimated balance of $782,125. 01 (b) The unexpended and unobligated general fund balances of the following 02 appropriations, not to exceed a total amount of $11,165,260, are reappropriated to the 03 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for federal-aid highway state match, 04 including unforeseen or federally ineligible costs in previous and current fiscal year federal- 05 aid highway projects: 06 (1) sec. 100, ch. 2, FSSLA 1999, page 69, lines 29 - 30, and allocated on page 07 69, lines 31 - 32, as amended by sec. 18(a)(23), ch. 14, SLA 2009, and sec. 21(m)(4), ch. 1, 08 TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, national highway system 09 program (NHS) construction, national highway system (NHS) state match), not to exceed 10 $2,499; 11 (2) sec. 1, ch. 61, SLA 2001, page 26, line 14, and allocated on page 26, lines 12 24 - 25, as amended by sec. 21(m)(10), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation 13 and Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, federal-aid highway state match), not to 14 exceed $135,973; 15 (3) sec. 1, ch. 82, SLA 2003, page 36, line 27, and allocated on page 37, lines 16 11 - 12, as amended by sec. 21(m)(12), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017, and sec. 12(a)(2), ch. 8, SLA 17 2020 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, 18 federal-aid highway state match), not to exceed $5,699; 19 (4) sec. 1, ch. 82, SLA 2006, page 87, line 14 (Department of Transportation 20 and Public Facilities, state match for Gravina Island bridge - $9,926,370), not to exceed 21 $138,611; 22 (5) sec. 1, ch. 82, SLA 2006, page 87, line 25, and allocated on page 88, lines 23 13 - 14, as amended by sec. 12(a)(6), ch. 8, SLA 2020 (Department of Transportation and 24 Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, federal-aid highway state match), not to exceed 25 $441,955; 26 (6) sec. 4, ch. 30, SLA 2007, page 104, line 26, and allocated on page 105, 27 lines 17 - 18, as amended by sec. 21(m)(15), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017, and sec. 12(a)(10), ch. 8, 28 SLA 2020 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, 29 federal-aid highway state match), not to exceed $158,972; 30 (7) sec. 13, ch. 29, SLA 2008, page 161, line 3, and allocated on page 161, 31 lines 25 - 26, as amended by sec. 21(m)(16), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of 01 Transportation and Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, federal-aid highway state 02 match), not to exceed $18,219; 03 (8) sec. 1, ch. 15, SLA 2009, page 22, line 17, and allocated on page 22, lines 04 32 - 33, as amended by sec. 12(a)(13), ch. 8, SLA 2020, and sec. 41(a)(6), ch. 1, FSSLA 2023 05 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, federal-aid 06 highway state match), not to exceed $241,873; 07 (9) sec. 7, ch. 43, SLA 2010, page 38, line 21, and allocated on page 39, lines 08 5 - 6, as amended by sec. 21(m)(17), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and 09 Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, federal-aid highway state match), not to exceed 10 $122,920; 11 (10) sec. 1, ch. 5, FSSLA 2011, page 102, line 13, and allocated on page 102, 12 lines 28 - 29 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, 13 federal-aid highway state match - $42,000,000), not to exceed $66,428; 14 (11) sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2012, page 141, lines 21 - 22, and allocated on page 15 141, lines 23 - 24, as amended by sec. 21(m)(18), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of 16 Transportation and Public Facilities, surface transportation program, federal-aid highway state 17 match), not to exceed $891,798; 18 (12) sec. 1, ch. 16, SLA 2013, page 86, lines 21 - 22, and allocated on page 19 86, lines 23 - 24 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, surface transportation 20 program, federal-aid highway state match - $40,000,000), not to exceed $153,951; 21 (13) sec. 1, ch. 18, SLA 2014, page 64, line 17, and allocated on page 64, line 22 33, through page 65, line 3 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, statewide 23 federal programs, federal-aid highway state match - $40,000,000), not to exceed $117,984; 24 (14) sec. 1, ch. 38, SLA 2015, page 7, line 16, and allocated on page 7, lines 25 19 - 20 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, federal program match, federal- 26 aid highway state match - $50,000,000), not to exceed $56,815; 27 (15) sec. 1, ch. 2, 4SSLA 2016, page 7, line 31, and allocated on page 8, lines 28 3 - 4 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, federal program match, federal-aid 29 highway state match - $42,600,000), not to exceed $648,934; 30 (16) sec. 27(d), ch. 2, 4SSLA 2016 (Department of Transportation and Public 31 Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to exceed $89,741; 01 (17) sec. 27(e), ch. 2, 4SSLA 2016 (Department of Transportation and Public 02 Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to exceed $197,670; 03 (18) sec. 27(f), ch. 2, 4SSLA 2016 (Department of Transportation and Public 04 Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to exceed $200,098; 05 (19) sec. 1, ch. 1, TSSLA 2017, page 8, line 20, and allocated on page 8, lines 06 23 - 24 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, federal program match, federal- 07 aid highway state match - $34,100,000), not to exceed $860,836; 08 (20) sec. 21(b), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and Public 09 Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to exceed $631,960; 10 (21) sec. 21(h), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and Public 11 Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to exceed $139,195; 12 (22) sec. 21(i), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and Public 13 Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to exceed $481,530; 14 (23) sec. 21(j), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017, as amended by sec. 41(a)(14), ch. 1, 15 FSSLA 2023 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, federal-aid highway 16 match), not to exceed $593,404; 17 (24) sec. 21(q), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and Public 18 Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to exceed $107,128; 19 (25) sec. 1, ch. 19, SLA 2018, page 10, line 22, and allocated on page 10, lines 20 28 - 29 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, federal program match, federal- 21 aid highway state match - $51,850,000), not to exceed $1,813,735; 22 (26) sec. 26(b), ch. 19, SLA 2018 (Department of Transportation and Public 23 Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to exceed $116,091; 24 (27) sec. 26(c), ch. 19, SLA 2018 (Department of Transportation and Public 25 Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to exceed $646,158; 26 (28) sec. 26(d), ch. 19, SLA 2018 (Department of Transportation and Public 27 Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to exceed $201,800; 28 (29) sec. 26(e), ch. 19, SLA 2018, as amended by sec. 9(10), ch. 8, SLA 2024 29 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to 30 exceed $1,778,582; and 31 (30) sec. 26(g), ch. 19, SLA 2018 (Department of Transportation and Public 01 Facilities, federal-aid highway match), not to exceed $104,701. 02 (c) The unexpended and unobligated general fund balances of the following 03 appropriations, not to exceed a total amount of $9,807,384, are reappropriated to the 04 Department of Transportation and Public Facilities for federal-aid aviation state match, 05 including unforeseen or federally ineligible costs in previous and current fiscal year federal- 06 aid aviation projects: 07 (1) sec. 1, ch. 82, SLA 2006, page 87, line 25, and allocated on page 88, lines 08 11 - 12, as amended by sec. 21(n)(5), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and 09 Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, federal-aid aviation state match), not to exceed 10 $113,450; 11 (2) sec. 13, ch. 29, SLA 2008, page 161, line 3, and allocated on page 161, 12 lines 23 - 24, as amended by sec. 21(n)(7), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation 13 and Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, federal-aid aviation state match), not to 14 exceed $3,198; 15 (3) sec. 1, ch. 15, SLA 2009, page 22, line 17, and allocated on page 22, lines 16 30 - 31, as amended by sec. 21(n)(8), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and 17 Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, federal-aid aviation state match), not to exceed 18 $15,305; 19 (4) sec. 7, ch. 43, SLA 2010, page 38, line 21, and allocated on page 39, lines 20 3 - 4, as amended by sec. 21(n)(9), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of Transportation and 21 Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, federal-aid aviation state match), not to exceed 22 $10,040; 23 (5) sec. 1, ch. 5, FSSLA 2011, page 102, line 13, and allocated on page 102, 24 lines 26 - 27, as amended by sec. 21(n)(10), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of 25 Transportation and Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, federal-aid aviation state 26 match), not to exceed $206,231; 27 (6) sec. 1, ch. 17, SLA 2012, page 137, lines 27 - 28, and allocated on page 28 137, lines 29 - 30, as amended by sec. 21(n)(11), ch. 1, TSSLA 2017 (Department of 29 Transportation and Public Facilities, airport improvement program, federal-aid aviation state 30 match), not to exceed $11,617; 31 (7) sec. 1, ch. 16, SLA 2013, page 81, lines 14 - 15, and allocated on page 81, 01 lines 16 - 17 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, airport improvement 02 program, federal-aid aviation state match - $11,700,000), not to exceed $49,774; 03 (8) sec. 1, ch. 18, SLA 2014, page 64, line 17, and allocated on page 64, lines 04 31 - 32 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, statewide federal programs, 05 federal-aid aviation state match - $11,700,000), not to exceed $460,581; 06 (9) sec. 1, ch. 38, SLA 2015, page 7, line 16, and allocated on page 7, lines 17 07 - 18 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, federal program match, federal-aid 08 aviation state match - $11,700,000), not to exceed $503,872; 09 (10) sec. 1, ch. 2, 4SSLA 2016, page 7, line 31, and allocated on page 7, lines 10 32 - 33 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, federal program match, federal- 11 aid aviation state match - $10,800,000), not to exceed $4,362,928; 12 (11) sec. 1, ch. 1, TSSLA 2017, page 8, line 20, and allocated on page 8, lines 13 21 - 22 (Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, federal program match, federal- 14 aid aviation state match - $10,800,000), not to exceed $2,222,160; and 15 (12) sec. 26(a), ch. 19, SLA 2018 (Department of Transportation and Public 16 Facilities, federal-aid aviation match), not to exceed $1,848,228. 17 * Sec. 20. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR. (a) The unexpended and unobligated general 18 fund balances, not to exceed $100,000, of the following appropriations are reappropriated to 19 the Office of the Governor for expenses related to the commissioning of the USS Ted 20 Stevens, United States Navy ship, and associated support activities in the state for the fiscal 21 years ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027: 22 (1) sec. 1, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 19, line 20 (Office of the Governor, federal 23 infrastructure office - $1,012,700); 24 (2) sec. 1, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 19, line 23 (Office of the Governor, 25 commissions/special offices - $2,705,600); 26 (3) sec. 1, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 19, line 28 (Office of the Governor, 27 executive operations - $14,987,500); 28 (4) sec. 1, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 20, lines 22 - 23 (Office of the Governor, 29 state facilities maintenance and operations - $1,436,800); 30 (5) sec. 1, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 20, line 27 (Office of the Governor, office of 31 management and budget - $3,125,000); 01 (6) sec. 1, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 20, line 30 (Office of the Governor, elections 02 - $5,780,000); and 03 (7) sec. 21(b), ch. 7, SLA 2024 (Office of the Governor, office of management 04 and budget, support the cost of central services agencies that provide services under 05 AS 37.07.080(e)(2) in the fiscal years ending June 30, 2024, and June 30, 2025). 06 (b) The unexpended and unobligated general fund balances, after the appropriation 07 made in (a) of this section, of the appropriations listed in (a)(1) - (7) of this section are 08 reappropriated to the Office of the Governor for capital costs and material purchases related to 09 facilities repairs and maintenance, information technology improvements and upgrades, food 10 security, the 2026 Alaska Sustainable Energy Conference, government efficiencies, elections 11 equipment, and resource development analyses, studies, and process reviews. 12 (c) The unexpended and unobligated balance on June 30, 2025, of the Alaska capital 13 income fund (AS 37.05.565) is appropriated to the Office of the Governor for statewide 14 critical deferred maintenance, renovation, and repair. 15 * Sec. 21. REAPPROPRIATION OF LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATIONS. (a) The 16 unexpended and unobligated general fund balances, not to exceed $500,000, of the following 17 appropriations are reappropriated to the Legislative Council, council and subcommittees, to be 18 used for expenses related to the 2027 Council of State Governments West annual meeting for 19 the fiscal years ending June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, and June 30, 2028: 20 (1) sec. 1, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 43, line 17 (Alaska Legislature, Budget and 21 Audit Committee - $18,094,700); 22 (2) sec. 1, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 43, line 22 (Alaska Legislature, Legislative 23 Council - $30,229,100); 24 (3) sec. 1, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 44, line 3 (Alaska Legislature, legislative 25 operating budget - $35,496,800); 26 (4) sec. 2, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 51, line 21, and page 57, lines 13 - 16 (SB 27 259, compensation for certain state employees, Alaska Legislature, legislature unallocated, 28 agency unallocated appropriation - $5,119,000); 29 (5) sec. 2, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 57, lines 17 - 21 (SCR 10, joint legis seafood 30 industry task force, Alaska Legislature, Legislative Council, council and subcommittees - 31 $50,000); and 01 (6) sec. 8, ch. 7, SLA 2024, page 84, line 17 (Alaska Legislature, Legislative 02 Council - $335,000). 03 (b) The unexpended and unobligated general fund balances, after the appropriation 04 made in (a) of this section, of the appropriations listed in (a)(1) - (6) of this section are 05 reappropriated to the Legislative Council, council and subcommittees, for renovation and 06 repair of, technology improvements to, and other necessary projects related to legislative 07 buildings and facilities. 08 * Sec. 22. Section 1, ch. 8, SLA 2024, page 13, lines 31 - 32, and allocated on page 14, lines 09 5 - 7, is repealed. 10 * Sec. 23. LAPSE. (a) The appropriations made in secs. 1, 4, 7, 9(2), 10, 11(b), 12(a), 13 - 11 15, 17 - 19, 20(b) and (c), and 21(b) of this Act are for capital projects and lapse under 12 AS 37.25.020. 13 (b) The appropriations made in secs. 9(1) and 12(b) of this Act are for the 14 capitalization of funds and do not lapse. 15 * Sec. 24. RETROACTIVITY. (a) Sections 4 - 7, 16, and 22 of this Act are retroactive to 16 March 31, 2025. 17 (b) Sections 13, 15(1), 17, and 19 - 21 of this Act are retroactive to June 30, 2025. 18 (c) Sections 1 - 3, 8 - 12, 14, 15(2), and 18 of this Act are retroactive to July 1, 2025. 19 * Sec. 25. CONTINGENCIES. (a) The appropriation in the amount of $3,693,500 made in 20 sec. 1 of this Act relating to the purchase by the Department of Commerce, Community, and 21 Economic Development of nonvoting, preferred shares issued by the Alaska Commercial 22 Fishing and Agriculture Bank is contingent on passage by the Thirty-Fourth Alaska State 23 Legislature during the First Regular Session and enactment into law of Senate Bill 156 or a 24 substantially similar bill enabling the bank to make loans under AS 44.81.215 to persons 25 involved in the state's commercial fishing industry. 26 (b) The appropriation made in sec. 11(a) of this Act is contingent on incorporation of 27 the Xunaa Borough on or before December 31, 2025. 28 (c) The appropriation made in sec. 12(a) of this Act is contingent on the sale of the 29 Stratton Library building in Sitka to the Alaska Court System. 30 (d) The appropriation made in sec. 18 of this Act is contingent on passage by the 31 Thirty-Fourth Alaska State Legislature during the First Regular Session and enactment into 01 law of Senate Bill 92 or a substantially similar bill relating to corporate tax law changes. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.